Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that in order to safeguard life, health, and property and to promote public welfare, it is necessary to regulate the practice of registered commercial interior design. The practice of registered commercial interior design in Washington is declared a professional practice, subject to regulation and control in the public interest. It is a matter of public interest and concern that the practice of registered commercial interior design, as defined under this chapter, merits and receives the confidence of the public and shall be limited to those persons determined by the board to be qualified and registered under this chapter.It is the purpose of this chapter to promote, preserve, and protect the public health, safety, and welfare by and through the registration and regulation of persons, whether within or outside of Washington, who engage in the practice of registered commercial interior design within Washington. In furtherance of this purpose, this chapter constitutes the Washington state board for architects and registered commercial interior designers, whose members, functions, and procedures shall be established in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administration of the construction contract" means the periodic observation of materials and work to observe the general compliance with the construction contract documents and does not include responsibility for supervising construction methods and processes, site conditions, equipment operations, personnel, or safety on the worksite.(2) "Applicant" means an individual who seeks registration in accordance with the requirements and processes set forth in this chapter and as may be established by the board.(3) "Approved educational program" means an educational program as approved by the board.(4) "Architect" means an individual who is registered as an architect under chapter 18.08 RCW to practice architecture.(5) "Board" means the Washington state board for architects and registered commercial interior designers constituted under RCW 18.08.330 and governed by RCW 18.08.340.(6) "Certificate of authorization" means a certificate issued by the director to a business entity that authorizes the entity to practice registered commercial interior design.(7) "Certificate of registration" means the certificate issued by the director to a newly registered commercial interior designer.(8) "Council for interior design qualification" or "CIDQ" means the council for interior design qualification or its successor.(9) "Department" means the department of licensing.(10) "Director" means the director of licensing.(11) "Engineer" means an individual who is registered as an engineer under chapter 18.43 RCW to practice engineering.(12) "Interior nonstructural construction and alteration project" means interior work within the building envelope that involves the construction, modification, or removal of nonstructural elements that do not affect the structural, seismic, or exterior envelope systems of a building or structure.(13) "Interior nonstructural element" means an interior assembly, component, or finish located within a building that:(a) Does not bear, support, or transfer structural loads to the foundation, frame, or structural system of a building;(b) Is not part of the building's primary or secondary structural system, including but not limited to load-bearing walls, columns, beams, floor and roof structural systems, and foundations;(c) Can be constructed, altered, relocated, or removed without compromising the structural integrity, stability, or safety of the building;(d) Includes, but is not limited to:(i) Nonload-bearing interior partitions and demountable partition systems;(ii) Interior glazing systems, including glazing in nonload-bearing walls;(iii) Nonload-bearing interior ceiling assemblies, including ceiling systems that do not contribute to the structural or seismic integrity of the building, and raised access floor systems not integral to the structural frame;(iv) Interior finish assemblies such as flooring finishes, wall and ceiling finishes, and applied surface treatments;(v) Interior stairs that are not structural and are outside of protected exit stairways;(vi) Interior millwork, casework, cabinetry, and trim;(vii) Interior hardware and door assemblies;(viii) Decorative interior architectural elements that do not affect structural performance; and(ix) An element designed and installed in accordance with prescriptive requirements for the seismic anchorage, bracing, or restraint of interior nonstructural assemblies and components, as permitted by applicable codes and standards, and not requiring engineering analysis or certification.(14) "National council for interior design qualification certification" or "NCIDQ certification" means the certification issued by the CIDQ for successful completion of the NCIDQ examination.(15) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional service corporation, corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in the state.(16) "Practice of registered commercial interior design" means the analysis, planning, design, coordination, documentation, and management of interior nonstructural construction and alteration projects in compliance with applicable codes, standards, regulations, and guidelines. The "practice of registered commercial interior design" includes the following:(a) Programming, space planning, predesign analysis, and conceptual design of interior nonstructural elements;(b) Preparation of documents and technical submissions related to interior construction, finish materials, furnishings, fixtures, and equipment;(c) Rendering of designs, plans, drawings, specifications, contract documents, and other interior technical submissions;(d) Construction and contract administration for interior nonstructural construction and alteration projects within a proposed or existing building or structure;(e) Alteration or construction of interior nonstructural elements;(f) Integration of interior nonstructural elements with mechanical, electrical, and plumbing distribution systems, including coordination of interior systems at points of connection to central building infrastructure, as permitted by code. This may include, but is not limited to, the layout of branch distribution, integration of local equipment or panels dedicated to that space, and coordination of consultant work as required;(g) Coordination with structural engineers, as appropriate, to confirm compatibility of interior nonstructural work with structural elements and to identify any requirements affecting interior construction;(h) Documentation of prescriptive seismic anchorage and restraint of interior nonstructural elements in accordance with code-recognized methods; any required engineering analysis or certification remains under the responsible design or manufacturing professional;(i) Preparation of a physical plan of space within a proposed or existing building or structure, in compliance with creating and maintaining accessible, safe, and code-conforming environments, including any of the following:(i) Determination of spatial layouts creating or modifying circulation paths;(ii) Determination of egress requirements, including calculation of occupant load, travel distance, egress width, number, and arrangement of exits;(iii) Design of interior egress components, including exit access up to the protected vertical exits and exit discharge, and modifications to an existing horizontal exit access within a building, provided the resulting occupant load does not exceed the existing or potential capacity of the building's shared egress systems;(iv) Assessment and analysis of interior life safety and fire protection needs to comply with codes, standards, regulations, and guidelines related to interior nonstructural elements, encompassing the integration of design requirements for passive fire protection systems and the coordination of active fire protection systems as they affect interior construction and egress;(v) Interior material selection and application for all portions of an interior construction project, including the means of egress system;(vi) Compliance with applicable codes, standards, regulations and guidelines, including coordination and verification of how existing building systems outside the scope of practice may affect interior nonstructural work;(j) Documenting or referencing building systems, assemblies, elements, or components outside the scope of practice defined in this section for purposes of demonstrating compliance with applicable codes, standards, regulations, and guidelines when those systems affect the interior work within the registered commercial interior designer's responsible control.(i) Verification of such conditions shall be based on record documents, design documents under the responsible control of licensed design professionals associated with the project, prior approved permits, or other evidence acceptable to the authority having jurisdiction.(ii) Responsible control for systems, assemblies, elements, or components outside the registered commercial interior designer's scope remains with the licensed design professional of record for those portions of the project.(iii) When any system, assembly, element, or component of a project extends beyond the scope of practice defined in this section, the registered commercial interior designer shall promptly notify the client in writing and recommend consultation with a design professional licensed to perform that work.(17) "Registered commercial interior designer" means an individual holding a valid certificate of registration or certificate of authorization issued by the director authorizing the practice of registered commercial interior design.(18) "Registered professional commercial interior design firm" means a business entity registered in Washington to offer and provide registered commercial interior design services under section 8 of this act.(19) "Responsible control" means the direct personal supervision over, and detailed knowledge of, the content of all technical submissions that are ordinarily exercised by a registered commercial interior designer when applying the requisite standard of care.(20) "Review" means a process of examination and evaluation, of the documents, for compliance with applicable codes, standards, regulations, and guidelines affecting the built environment that includes the ability to control the final product.(21) "Structure" means any construction consisting of load-bearing members such as the foundation, roof, floors, walls, columns, girders, and beams, or a combination of any number of these parts, with or without other parts or appurtenances.(22) "Technical submissions" means the documents covering the practice of registered commercial interior design necessary to demonstrate compliance with applicable regulatory requirements and/or to fabricate or construct a project including, but not limited to, drawings, digital models, specifications, performance criteria, and installation requirements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a registered commercial interior designer to engage in the practice of architecture under chapter 18.08 RCW or engineering under chapter 18.43 RCW or provide services that constitute the practice of architecture or engineering.(2) The practice of registered commercial interior design does not include modifications or additions to any of the following:(a) Changes of building use to occupancies not already allowed by the current building or structure, or to occupancies of a greater hazard as defined by the means of egress hazard categories table in chapter 10, change of occupancy, in the international existing building code;(b) The construction classification of the building or structure;(c) The structural system of a building, including changing the building's dead load on the structural system and the seismic design of interior elements, including analysis and structural calculations for anchorage, bracing, or restraint beyond prescriptive requirements permitted by code; however, registered commercial interior designers may coordinate with structural engineers to confirm compatibility of interior nonstructural elements with existing structural elements;(d) The building envelope, including load-bearing and nonload-bearing exterior walls, exterior wall claddings, exterior wall openings, exterior windows and doors, balconies and similar projections, roof assemblies and rooftop structures, and glass and glazing for exterior use in both vertical, horizontal, and sloped applications, and any element or assembly that affects the building's weather resistance, moisture management, thermal performance, or structural weatherproofing, including any new penetrations or modifications to existing building envelope penetrations;(e) Engineering of mechanical, plumbing, heating, air conditioning, ventilation, electrical, low voltage, active fire protection, or fire alarm systems;(f) Integration of central mechanical, electrical, and plumbing infrastructure serving the building as a whole, including plant equipment (boilers, chillers, cooling towers, etc.), electrical service and distribution (service entry, transformers, switchgear, main distribution panels), and plumbing mains and pumps;(g) Elevators and conveying systems;(h) Shared building egress systems that serve the building as a whole, including vertical protected exit enclosures and the exit discharge points, or modifications that would increase occupant loads beyond the designed capacity of those systems; or(i) Life safety systems pertaining to fire safety of primary structural elements or the fire protection of primary structural elements, smoke evacuation and compartmentalization systems, or fire-rated vertical shafts in multistory structures.(3) The following individuals and firms are not required to obtain a registration to practice registered commercial interior design pursuant to this chapter:(a) An individual or firm who has a certificate or authorization to practice as an architect under chapter 18.08 RCW shall be qualified for a registration upon approval of a completed application for such registration and payment of the corresponding application fee. An architect who is licensed or registered is not required to obtain a registration to practice registered commercial interior design but must register as a registered commercial interior designer prior to using the title "registered commercial interior designer";(b) An individual who prepares plans, drawings, or specifications for buildings for their personal private residential use, including single-family or multifamily homes in concert with local governing zoning, codes, and jurisdictional requirements such as "appurtenances";(c) A person who prepares drawings of the layout of materials or furnishings or who participates in the selection of materials or furnishings used in commercial interior design including, but not limited to:(i) Decorative accessories;(ii) Wallcoverings, wall finishes or paint;(iii) Floor coverings, tile, wood, stone, or concrete;(iv) Window coverings;(v) Lighting fixtures which do not disrupt structural elements;(vi) Plumbing fixtures which do not disrupt structural elements;(vii) Professional services limited to the design of kitchen and bath spaces or the specification of products for kitchen and bath areas in noncommercial settings; and(viii) Spatial arrangements, interior construction assemblies, millwork, fixtures, equipment, and furniture, if the preparation or implementation of those drawings or the installation of those materials or furnishings is not regulated by any building code or other law, ordinance, rule, or regulation governing the alteration or construction of a structure.(4) This chapter shall not affect or prevent:(a) The practice of naval architecture, landscape architecture as authorized in chapter 18.96 RCW, engineering as authorized in chapter 18.43 RCW, or the provision of space planning or interior design services not affecting public health or safety;(b) Drafters, clerks, project managers, superintendents, and other employees of architects from acting under the instructions, control, or supervision of an architect;(c) The construction, alteration, or supervision of construction of buildings or structures by contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or superintendents employed by contractors or the preparation of shop drawings in connection therewith;(d) Owners or contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW from engaging persons who are not architects to observe and supervise construction of a project;(e) Any person from doing design work including preparing construction contract documents and administration of the construction contract for the erection, enlargement, repair, or alteration of a structure or any appurtenance to a structure regardless of size, if the structure is to be used for a residential building of up to and including four dwelling units or a farm building or is a structure used in connection with or auxiliary to such residential building or farm building such as a garage, barn, shed, or shelter for animals or machinery;(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person from doing design work including preparing construction contract documents and administering the contract for construction, erection, enlargement, alteration, or repairs of or to a building of any occupancy up to a total building size of 4,000 square feet; or(g) Any person from doing design work, including preparing construction contract documents and administration of the contract, for alteration of or repairs to a building where the project size is not more than 4,000 square feet in a building greater than 4,000 square feet and when the work contemplated by the design does not affect the life safety or structural systems of the building. The combined square footage of simultaneous projects allowed under this subsection (4) may not exceed 4,000 square feet.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) To obtain a certificate of registration to engage in the practice of registered commercial interior design in Washington, an applicant must be of good moral character, at least 18 years of age, and shall submit the following qualifications to the board:(a) A complete and signed written application in the form prescribed by the board;(b) Evidence of graduation and receipt of a degree from an approved educational program;(c) Evidence indicating the successful completion of the experience deemed necessary by the board;(d) Evidence of the successful completion of the NCIDQ examination administered by CIDQ;(e) Evidence of the successful completion of a Washington state law review examination for registered commercial interior designers, as established by the board; and(f) Payment of all applicable fees specified by the board.(2) In lieu of furnishing evidence supporting subsection (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section, an applicant may provide a copy of the applicant's NCIDQ certification.(3) The board may use documentation and verified data stored by CIDQ in the same way that it may use data stored by the board to establish an applicant's qualifications for a registration. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board shall share such information with CIDQ as may be reasonably requested from time to time, provided that CIDQ agrees to maintain the confidentiality of such information.(4) A certificate of registration shall be effective upon issuance by the director. A person issued a registration may use the title of registered commercial interior designer in Washington, subject to the provisions of this chapter and the board regulations.(5) An applicant for registration as a registered commercial interior designer shall be of a good moral character and at least 18 years of age.(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any individual or firm who has a certificate or authorization to practice as an architect under chapter 18.08 RCW shall be qualified for a registration for commercial interior design upon approval of a completed application for such registration and payment of the corresponding application fee. An architect who is licensed or registered within Washington is not required to obtain a registration to practice registered commercial interior design but must register as a registered commercial interior designer prior to using the title "registered commercial interior designer" in Washington. For architects registered as registered commercial interior designers, satisfaction of the requirements for renewal of licensure or registration as an architect shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements for renewal of the registration as a "registered commercial interior designer."NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The director may, upon receipt of the current registration fee, grant a certificate of registration to an applicant who:(1) Is a registered commercial interior designer in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or another country;(2) Has qualifications and experience determined by the board to be equivalent to the qualifications and experience required of a person registered under section 4 of this act; and(3) Provides evidence of successful completion of the Washington state law review examination for registered commercial interior designers, as established by the board.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. (1) The renewal date for certificates of registration shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086. Registrants who fail to pay the renewal fee within 30 days of the due date shall pay all delinquent fees plus a penalty fee equal to one-third of the renewal fee. A registrant who fails to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may be reinstated under such circumstances as the board determines. The renewal and penalty fees and the frequency of renewal assessment shall be authorized under this chapter. The renewal date for certificates of authorization shall be the anniversary of the date of authorization.(2) The director may, in their discretion, consider any relevant extenuating circumstances duly submitted in conjunction with any petition and application for the reinstatement of a registration where the applicant can demonstrate hardship, so long as the board maintains its public protection mission in considering any such petition and application. The board shall by regulation set forth procedures and requirements for the reinstatement of a registered commercial interior designer's registration.(3) Any registrant in good standing may withdraw from the practice of registered commercial interior design by giving written notice to the director, and may within five years thereafter resume active practice upon payment of the then-current renewal fee. A registrant may be reinstated after a withdrawal of more than five years under such circumstances as the board determines.(4) A registered commercial interior designer must demonstrate professional development since the individual's last renewal or initial registration, as the case may be. The board shall by rule describe professional development activities acceptable to the board and the form of documentation of the activities required by the board. The board may decline to renew a registration if the registered commercial interior designer's professional development activities do not meet the standards set by the board by rule. When adopting rules under the authority of this subsection, the board shall strive to ensure that the rules are consistent with the continuing professional education requirements and systems in use by national professional organizations representing registered commercial interior designers and in use by other states.(i) Registered commercial interior designers shall, as part of their license renewal, certify that they have completed the required continuing professional development required by this section.(ii) The board may adopt reasonable exemptions from the requirements of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. (1) The director shall issue a certificate of registration to any applicant who has, to the satisfaction of the board, met all the requirements for registration upon payment of the registration fee as provided in this chapter. All certificates of registration shall show the full name of the registrant, have the registration number, and shall be signed by the chair of the board and by the director. The issuance of a certificate of registration by the director is prima facie evidence that the person named therein is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a registered commercial interior designer.(2) Each registrant shall obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the registered commercial interior designer's name, registration number, the title "registered commercial interior designer," and the name of this state. All technical submissions prepared by a registered commercial interior designer and filed with public authorities must be sealed and signed by the registered commercial interior designer. It is unlawful to seal and sign a document after a registrant's certificate of registration or authorization has expired, been revoked, or is suspended.(3)(a) A registered commercial interior designer may seal and sign technical submissions under the following conditions:(i) Prepared by the registered commercial interior designer;(ii) Prepared by the registered commercial interior designer's regularly employed subordinates;(iii) Prepared in part by an individual or firm under a direct subcontract with the registered commercial interior designer; or(iv) Prepared in collaboration with a registered commercial interior designer who is licensed in a jurisdiction recognized by the board, provided there is a contractual agreement between the registered commercial interior designers.(b) A registered commercial interior designer who seals and signs the technical submissions under this subsection (3) is responsible to the same extent as if the technical submissions were prepared by the registered commercial interior designer.(4) Technical submissions filed with a public authority should include a board prescribed scope of practice attestation form affirming that the work is within the practice of registered commercial interior design under this chapter. The board shall adopt rules for the form's use and requirements for acceptance by permitting authorities.(5) A new certificate of registration or certificate of authorization to replace any certificate lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued by the director. A charge, determined as provided in RCW 43.24.086, shall be made for such issuance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. (1) Any business entity, including a sole proprietorship, offering registered commercial interior design services in Washington state must register with the board, regardless of its business structure. A business entity shall file with the board a list of individuals registered under this chapter as responsible for the practice of registered commercial interior design by the business entity in this state and provides that full authority to make all final design decisions on behalf of the business entity with respect to work performed by the business entity in this state. Further, the person having the practice of registered commercial interior design in their charge is themself a general partner (if a partnership or limited liability partnership), a manager (if a limited liability company), or a director (if a business corporation or professional service corporation) and is registered to practice registered commercial interior design in this state.(2) A business primarily engaged in, or representing itself as primarily being engaged in, the sale or distribution of furniture, fixtures, or equipment is not eligible for registration as a registered commercial interior design firm. This does not prohibit collaboration with such businesses for client-directed procurement or specification services, nor prevent an individual registered commercial interior designer employed by such a business from maintaining individual registration.(3) The business entity shall furnish the board with such information about its organization and activities as the board shall require by rule.(4) Upon filing with the board of the application for certificate of authorization, the certified copy of the resolution, and the information specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall authorize the director to issue to the business entity a certificate of authorization to practice registered commercial interior design in this state.(5) Any business entity practicing or offering to practice registered commercial interior design, whether or not it is authorized to practice registered commercial interior design under this chapter, shall be jointly and severally responsible to the same degree as an individual registered commercial interior designer and shall conduct their business without misconduct or malpractice in the practice of registered commercial interior design as defined in this chapter.(6) For each certificate of authorization issued under this section there shall be paid a certification fee and an annual certification renewal fee as prescribed by the director under RCW 43.24.086.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A registered commercial interior designer shall maintain documentation of technical submissions for at least five years and make records available to the director upon request. Records must be adequate to demonstrate the registered commercial interior designer's responsible control over the technical submissions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. (1) Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of registered commercial interior design or use the designation "registered commercial interior designer" or any other designation, words, or letters indicating registration as a registered commercial interior designer, including abbreviations, or hold themself out as a registered commercial interior designer unless duly registered as such by the board. This subsection does not prohibit a person who is exempt, pursuant to this chapter, from holding themselves out to the public or soliciting business as an interior designer.(2) A person may not knowingly:(a) Use or attempt to use the registration of another registered commercial interior designer;(b) Use or attempt to use a registration that has been suspended, revoked, or placed on inactive or delinquent status;(c) File or cause to be filed a false or misleading registered commercial interior design scope of practice attestation form;(d) Obtain or attempt to obtain registration from the board by fraud;(e) Make any willfully false oath or affirmation to the board;(f) Accept or receive compensation, directly or indirectly, from a source other than their client or employer for a project under the registered commercial interior designer's engagement, if such compensation could compromise or appear to compromise their professional judgment or responsible control.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. (1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule promulgated under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and may also be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for each offense.(2) It shall be the duty of all officers in the state or any political subdivision thereof to enforce this chapter. Any public officer may initiate an action before the board to enforce the provisions of this chapter.(3) The board may apply for relief by injunction without bond to restrain a person from committing any act that is prohibited by this chapter. In such proceedings, it is not necessary to allege or prove either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist or that substantial irreparable damage would result from the continued violation thereof. The members of the board shall not be personally liable for their actions in any such proceeding or in any other proceeding instituted by the board under this chapter. The board in any proper case shall cause prosecution to be instituted in any county or counties where any violation of this chapter occurs, and shall aid the prosecution of the violator.(4) No person practicing registered commercial interior design is entitled to maintain a proceeding in any court of this state relating to services in the practice of registered commercial interior design unless it is alleged and proved that the person was registered or authorized under this chapter to practice or offer to practice registered commercial interior design at the time the design services were offered or provided.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. The board shall have the power to impose any action listed in section 11 of this act upon the following grounds:(1) Engaging in or committing any prohibited act as described in section 10 of this act, including but not limited to acts that compromise or appear to compromise professional judgment, independence, or responsible control;(2) Offering to pay, paying, or accepting, either directly or indirectly, any substantial gift, bribe, or other consideration to influence the award of professional work;(3) Being willfully untruthful or deceptive in any professional report, statement, or testimony;(4) Having a financial interest in the bidding for or the performance of a contract to supply labor or materials for or to construct a project for which employed or retained as a registered commercial interior designer except with the informed consent of the client or employer after full disclosure; or allowing such interest to influence professional judgment;(5) Signing or permitting a seal to be affixed to any drawings or specifications that were not prepared or reviewed by the registered commercial interior designer or under the registered commercial interior designer's personal supervision by persons subject to the registered commercial interior designer's direction and control; or(6) Willfully evading or trying to evade any law, ordinance, code, or regulation governing construction of buildings.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. There is established in the state treasury the registered commercial interior designer's license account, into which all fees paid pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited, except as provided in section 17 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. The board, through the director, shall immediately suspend the certificate of licensure to practice registered commercial interior design of a person who has been certified under RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the individual is in compliance with the order.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. The uniform regulation of business and professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the board determines that the military training or experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. (1) There is imposed a fee of $6.50 on each certificate of registration, renewal of a certificate of registration, certificate of authorization, and renewal of a certificate of authorization, issued by the director under this chapter. The director must collect this fee and must quarterly remit moneys collected under this subsection to the state treasury.(2) The fee established by subsection (1) of this section is in addition to other fees authorized by this chapter and prescribed by the director under RCW 43.24.086.(3) All moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the building code council account in the state treasury.Sec. 18. RCW 18.08.330 and 2010 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:There is ((created))constituted a state board for architects and registered commercial interior designers consisting of ((seven))nine members who shall be appointed by the governor. Six members shall be registered architects who are residents of the state and have at least ((eight))five years' experience in the practice of architecture as registered architects in responsible charge of architectural work or responsible charge of architectural teaching. Two members shall be registered commercial interior designers who are residents of the state and have at least eight years' experience in responsible charge of the practice or teaching of registered commercial interior design. For the initial appointments to the board, a registered commercial interior designer may qualify with equivalent professional experience in commercial interior design prior to the establishment of the registration system, as determined by the board.One member shall be a public member, who is not and has never been a registered architect and who does not employ and is not employed by or professionally or financially associated with an architect.The terms of each newly appointed member shall be six years.Every member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor. On the expiration of the term of each member, the governor shall appoint a successor to serve for a term of six years or until the next successor has been appointed.The governor may remove any member of the board for cause. Vacancies in the board for any reason shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.The board shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary. The secretary may delegate his or her authority to the executive director.Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.The board shall have oversight authority over both the practice of architecture under chapter 18.08 RCW and the practice of registered commercial interior design under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 20 of this act).Sec. 19. RCW 18.08.340 and 2010 c 129 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board may adopt such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary for the proper performance of its duties under this chapter.(2) The director shall employ an executive director subject to approval by the board.(3) The executive director shall have oversight authority over the state board of architects and registered commercial interior designers constituted under RCW 18.08.330.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 20. Sections 1 through 17 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.--- END ---